Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. Missing Persons

§ 1820.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Missing person” means an individual:

whose whereabouts is unknown; and

with either a physical disability, a mental disability, or a developmental disability; or
(B) (i) with either a physical disability, a mental disability, or a developmental disability; or

who is an unemancipated minor.

“Unemancipated minor” means an individual under the age of majority who has not married and who resides with a parent or legal guardian.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013.

§ 1821.
Missing person complaint.

A person filing a missing person complaint with a law enforcement agency shall provide at a minimum the following information:

the name, age, address, and identifying characteristics of the missing person;

the length of time the person has been missing;

the name of the complainant and the relationship of the complainant to the missing person; and

any other relevant information provided by the complainant or requested by the law enforcement agency.

All law enforcement personnel on active duty shall be promptly notified that the person is missing.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 151.

§ 1822.
Missing person report.

Upon receiving a complaint, the law enforcement agency shall promptly prepare a missing person report. The report shall include all information contained in the missing person complaint and any information or evidence gathered by a preliminary investigation, if one was made.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 152.

§ 1823.
Dissemination of missing person report.

Upon completion of the report, a copy shall promptly be forwarded to the Commissioner of Public Safety, all law enforcement agencies within the jurisdiction where the missing person lives or was last seen, and other law enforcement agencies that can reasonably be expected to be involved in any investigation.

A copy of the report shall also be forwarded to:

all law enforcement agencies to which the complainant reasonably requests the report be sent;

any law enforcement agency requesting a copy of the missing person report; and

all media in the region in which the missing person lives, or was last seen, unless such disclosure would impede an ongoing investigation or unless otherwise requested by the complainant.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013;

2021, No. 20

, § 153.

§ 1824.
Searches for missing persons.

A law enforcement agency shall commence a search for a missing person as soon as a report is received.

Any rule specifying an automatic time limitation before commencing a missing person investigation shall be invalid.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the search for a missing person whose whereabouts is unknown within the backcountry, remote areas, or waters of the State shall be conducted as provided in subchapter 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013.

§ 1825.
Missing person complaints regarding unemancipated minors.

If a missing person complaint involves an unemancipated minor, including a runaway child as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1311

, the law enforcement agency shall transmit the report, as soon as it is complete, to the Department of Public Safety for inclusion in the National Crime Information Center database.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2001, No. 41

, § 3;

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013.

§ 1826.
False information on missing person.

A person who knowingly makes a false report of a missing person or knowingly makes a false statement in the report shall be fined not more than $1,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986.

§ 1827.
Commissioner of Public Safety; cooperation.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall cooperate with and support all law enforcement agencies in this State in matters relating to missing persons. When necessary to protect a missing person from harm, the Commissioner shall coordinate local and State efforts to search for and rescue the missing person.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1986; amended

2003, No. 66

, § 95b;

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013.

§ 1828.
Vermont Amber Alert Program.

The Department of Public Safety shall establish the Vermont Amber Alert Program to aid in the identification and location of abducted children. The Department shall administer the Program pursuant to the following:

A law enforcement agency that verifies the abduction of a child shall notify the Department of Public Safety.

The Department shall establish a procedure for verifying the need to issue an Amber Alert.

The Department of Public Safety shall issue an alert over the Vermont Emergency Alert System if:

a law enforcement agency notifies the Department of the abduction of a child;

there is sufficient information about the child or the person suspected of abducting the child that an immediate broadcast might help locate the child; and

the child is in danger of imminent death or serious bodily harm.

An alert issued under this section shall be sent to the Federal Communications Commission’s designated state Emergency Alert System broadcaster in Vermont. Participating radio and television stations shall broadcast the alert at intervals established by the Department. The alert shall include all information that the Department determines may assist in the safe recovery of the abducted child and instructions explaining how a person with information related to the abduction may contact a law enforcement agency.

A law enforcement agency that locates a child who is the subject of an alert issued under this section shall immediately notify the law enforcement agency that requested the Amber Alert.

An alert issued under this section shall be canceled:

if the Department notifies the Federal Communications Commission’s designated state Emergency Alert System broadcaster in Vermont that the child has been located; or

at the expiration of a notification period specified by the Department.

A radio or television station that accurately broadcasts information pursuant to this section shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of the broadcast of such information.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 33

, § 1, eff. May 22, 2003; amended

2013, No. 26

, § 1, eff. May 13, 2013.